Illinois, session 104th, SB2905.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by adding Section 514-9.05 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/14-9.05 new)7    Sec. 14-9.05. Special Education Workload Task Force.8    (a) The Special Education Workload Task Force is created 9to develop guidance on the calculation of workload limits for 10special educators, including both special education classroom 11and resource teachers and related service providers, 12including, but not limited to, school social workers, school 13psychologists, school counselors, school nurses, physical 14therapists, occupational therapists, and speech-language 15pathologists. The Task Force shall consist of all the 16following members:17        (1) One member who represents a statewide professional 18    teachers' organization, appointed by the State 19    Superintendent of Education.20        (2) One member who represents a different statewide 21    professional teachers' organization, appointed by the 22    State Superintendent of Education.23        (3) One member from a statewide organization   SB2905- 2 -LRB104 17521 LNS 30948 b1    representing school principals, appointed by the State 2    Superintendent of Education.3        (4) One member from a statewide organization 4    representing school administrators, appointed by the State 5    Superintendent of Education.6        (5) One member from a statewide organization 7    representing special educators, appointed by the State 8    Superintendent of Education.9        (6) One member from a statewide organization 10    representing school social workers, appointed by the State 11    Superintendent of Education.12        (7) One member from a statewide organization 13    representing school psychologists, appointed by the State 14    Superintendent of Education.15        (8) One member from a statewide organization 16    representing school counselors, appointed by the State 17    Superintendent of Education.18        (9) One member from a statewide organization 19    representing school nurses, appointed by the State 20    Superintendent of Education.21        (10) One member from a statewide organization 22    representing physical therapists, appointed by the State 23    Superintendent of Education.24        (11) One member from a statewide organization 25    representing occupational therapists, appointed by the 26    State Superintendent of Education.  SB2905- 3 -LRB104 17521 LNS 30948 b1        (12) One member from a statewide organization 2    representing speech-language pathologists, appointed by 3    the State Superintendent of Education.4    Task Force members shall serve without compensation.5    (b) The Task Force shall meet at the call of the State 6Superintendent of Education. The State Board of Education 7shall provide administrative and other support to the Task 8Force.9    (c) On or before June 30, 2027, the Task Force shall submit 10its guidance to the State Board of Education and the General 11Assembly as provided in Section 3.1 of the General Assembly 12Organization Act. The Task Force is dissolved upon submission 13of this guidance.14    (d) This Section is repealed on June 30, 2028.